Massachusetts, session 194th, H3562.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Secretary of Energy and
Environmental Affairs shall perform a study on the feasibility of installing solar panels on
municipal and state buildings and land, including possible funding sources for feasible projects.
The Secretary shall report the results of the study by filing a report with the Clerk of the
Senate; the Clerk of the House of Representatives; the Department of Environmental Protection;
and the Joint Committee on Environment, Natural Resources and Agriculture no later than one
year after passage of this act.
of 1